Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16C.37] PAYROLL REPORTING PORTAL AND DATABASE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Portal and database. new text end new text begin No later than July 1, 2027, the commissioner shall develop and maintain a payroll reporting portal and database capable of accepting and retaining certified payrolls submitted in compliance with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Information required; availability to public. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, and by the 16th day of each month following the month the work was performed, the commissioner must make available to the public on the department's website the information required under section 177.30, paragraph (a), clause (6). new text end new text begin (b) The database must be searchable by contractor name, project name, county in which the work was performed, and project owner. new text end new text begin (c) The reporting portal must accept certified payroll forms provided by the commissioner that are fillable and designed to accept electronic signatures. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Portal registration. new text end new text begin All projects covered by state prevailing wage requirements, including but not limited to the requirements under sections 177.41, 177.42, 177.43, and 116J.871, subdivisions 2 and 3, must be registered in the portal by the project owner and assigned an identifying project number prior to the commencement of work. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting and notice requirements. new text end new text begin (a) All contractors covered by state prevailing wage requirements, including but not limited to the requirements under sections 177.41, 177.42, 177.43, and 116J.871, subdivisions 2 and 3, must report the certified payroll information required under subdivision 2 and section 177.30 to the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must provide notice to the project owner when a report is made by a contractor under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Fulfillment of other prevailing wage reporting requirements. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 177.43, subdivision 6, submission of certified payrolls under this section fulfills the contractor reporting requirements under sections 177.30, paragraph (a), clause (6), and 177.43, subdivision 3, but does not diminish the prevailing wage enforcement authority of the Department of Labor and Industry. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Local governments and project owner opt-in. new text end new text begin Local units of government and project owners may opt-in to participation in the portal and database created under this section for the purpose of collecting certified payroll in compliance with a local prevailing wage ordinance or labor standards policy. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1 is effective July 1, 2026. Subdivisions 2 to 6 are effective July 1, 2027, and apply to construction projects that begin on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PAYROLL REPORTING PORTAL AND DATABASE.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for information technology costs and administration of the payroll reporting portal and database established under Minnesota Statutes, section 16C.37. new text end